Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 3. County, Municipal and District Health Departments

§ 35-1-301.
Definitions; establishment; participation by municipality in district department.

For the purposes of this act [§§

35-1-301

through

35-1-309

], the word “municipality” shall mean and include any town, village or city of this state, and the word “district” shall mean and include any combination of said towns, villages, cities and counties of this state.

Any county, municipality, or district may, by resolution of the board of county commissioners or municipal governing body or by a majority of the votes cast by the qualified electors of such county, municipality, or district, establish and maintain a county, municipal, or district health department.

Any two (2) or more adjacent counties may, by resolutions of the boards of county commissioners or by a majority of the votes cast by the qualified electors establish and maintain a district health department.

Any municipality within a health department district may, by resolution of the municipal governing body or by a majority of the votes cast by the qualified electors of such municipality, participate in such a district health department.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 133, § 1; 1955, ch. 48, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-27.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of state or local government health officer's warrantless search — post-Camara cases, 53 ALR4th 1168.

§ 35-1-302.
Organization of units; membership of boards; removal.

Within thirty (30) days after the adoption of a resolution or resolutions to establish and maintain a county and/or city or district health department, the board or boards of county commissioners and/or city governing body, as the case may be, shall proceed to organize such a department by the appointment of a county and/or city or district board of health, hereinafter referred to as the board.

Each county and/or city board of health shall consist of five (5) members, all of whom shall be qualified electors of the county in which they serve, and one (1) shall have the degree of doctor of medicine and one (1) shall have the degree of doctor of dental surgery when available in said county. One (1) member of the board to be appointed for one (1) year; one (1) for two (2) years; one (1) for three (3) years, one (1) for four (4) years; and one (1) for five (5) years. Thereafter appointments for full term shall be for five (5) years. Vacancies for unexpired terms shall be filled by appointment by the board of county commissioners and/or city governing body.

The number of members on the district board shall be at least equal to the number of participating political subdivisions; each participating political subdivision shall have at least one (1) representative on the board; the board shall not have less than seven (7) members; at least one (1) member of the board shall have the degree of doctor of medicine and at least one (1) member shall have the degree of doctor of dental surgery. For the original board, one (1) member shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year, two (2) for a term of two (2) years, two (2) for three (3) years, two (2) for four (4) years. Thereafter, each appointment shall be for a term of four (4) years. The district board of health shall be appointed by a committee composed of one (1) member of each of the boards of county commissioners of the counties comprising the district.

Meetings of the board shall be held quarterly at such place as is designated by the board and at such other time as may be desirable upon call by the county and/or city or district health officer. Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but shall be entitled to payment for travel and other necessary expense incurred while attending meetings of the board.

The governing body which appointed the member of the board may remove that member of the board for cause without a public hearing unless the member requests that the action be taken during a public hearing. Vacancies on the board shall be filled by the governing body for the balance of the unexpired term created by the vacancy.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 133, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-28; 2012, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

added (e).

Laws 2012, ch. 104 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 21, 2012.

§ 35-1-303.
Rules and regulations; jurisdiction.

County and/or city and district boards of health may enact rules and regulations pertaining to the prevention of disease and the promotion of public health in the area over which such respective boards have jurisdiction. But in no instance shall such rules and regulations be less effective than, or in conflict with, rules and regulations promulgated by the state department of health. The district and/or city health officers shall have all powers vested by law in county health officers.

The jurisdiction of the county and/or city or district health department shall extend over all unincorporated areas and over all municipalities within the territorial limits of the county or counties comprising the district except municipalities of Class I may maintain their own health departments. However, any municipalities of Class I may merge its health services with that of the county or district in which such city is located.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 133, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-29; Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Cross references. —

For provision governing rules and regulations generally, see §

35-1-229

.

As to the duties of a local board of health with regard to a food safety system, see §

35-7-123

.

For provisions concerning organization, etc., of first class cities, see §

15-3-101

et seq.

§ 35-1-304.
Treasurer designated; fund to be created; composition and use of fund; preparation and submission of budget; tax levy authorized.

In the case of a county and/or city health department, the county and/or city treasurer, as a part of his official duties as county and/or city treasurer, shall serve as treasurer of the department, and his official bond as county and/or city treasurer shall extend to and cover his duties as treasurer of the department. In the case of a district health department, the county treasurer of the county in the district having the largest population, as a part of his official duties as county treasurer, shall serve as treasurer of the district department and his official bond as county treasurer shall extend to and cover his duties as treasurer of the department.

The treasurer of a county and/or city or district health department shall, upon organization of the department, create a county and/or city or district health department fund to which shall be credited:

Any moneys that may be appropriated from the general county fund or funds;

Any moneys received from state, federal or other grants or donations for local health purposes;

Any moneys received from mill levies authorized by this act [§§

35-1-301

through

35-1-309

].

Any moneys credited to said fund shall be expended only for maintenance and operation of the department and claims or demands against said fund shall be allowed upon certification by the health officer or a designated member of the board of health.

A county and/or city board of health shall, annually before April 1st of each year, estimate the total cost of maintaining the department for the ensuing fiscal year, and the amount of moneys that may be available from unexpended surpluses or from state or federal grants or other grants or donations. The estimates shall be submitted in the form of a budget to the board of county commissioners and/or city governing body and the board shall provide any moneys necessary over estimated moneys from surpluses, grants and donations to cover the total cost of maintaining the department for the ensuing fiscal year. If the city has chosen to have a biennial budget pursuant to W.S. 16-4-104(h), then the city board of health shall submit their budget to the city on April 1 of every other year in accordance with the city budget.

A district board of health shall, annually before April 1st of each year, estimate the total cost of maintaining and operating the department for the ensuing fiscal year and the amount of monies that may be available from unexpended surpluses or from state or federal grants or other grants or donations. The estimates shall be submitted in the form of a budget to a committee composed of the chairmen of the boards of county commissioners and/or city governing body of all counties and/or cities comprising the district. The cost of maintaining and operating the department, over estimated monies from surpluses, grants or donations, shall be apportioned by the committee among the counties comprising the district on a basis of population of each participating county in proportion to the total population of all counties comprising the district. The boards of county commissioners of the respective counties shall provide any monies necessary to cover the proportionate share of their county. If the cities in the district have chosen to have a biennial budget pursuant to W.S. 16-4-104(h), then the district board of health shall submit their budget to the cities on April 1 of every other year in accordance with the cities’ budget. If all the cities in the district are not on the same budget schedule, the district shall still submit a biennial budget. However, for those cities who budget annually, they shall appropriate an annual amount.

A tax levy may be made by the board of county commissioners specifically for the public health purposes on assessed valuation.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 133, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-30; Laws 1994, ch. 19, § 1; 2001, ch. 194, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to duties generally of treasurers of first class cities, see §§

15-3-208

to

15-3-210

.

As to bond and duties of county treasurer, see §§

18-3-801

to

18-3-814

.

For provisions relating to surety bonds of county and city treasurers, see §§

38-2-101

to

38-2-109

.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “as determined by the last federal census” following “having the largest population” in the second sentence of (a); and in (e), substituted “monies” for “moneys” throughout the subsection and, in the third sentence, deleted “as determined by the last federal census” following “on a basis of population.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, provides: “(a) No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b) No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census. To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

§ 35-1-305.
Appointment of health officers and other personnel generally; local board of health may fix fees for certain services.

In the counties, municipalities or districts where health departments are created, as provided herein, the local board of health may appoint a full-time or part-time health officer, deputy health officers, public health nurses, sanitarians, environmental health specialists and such other public health personnel as may be deemed necessary to adequately protect the public health. Any full-time or part-time health officer shall have a degree of doctor of medicine, be an advanced practice registered nurse as defined in W.S. 33-21-120(a)(i) or be a physician assistant as defined in W.S. 33-26-501(a)(iii). A full-time or part-time health officer appointed under this section shall assist the state department of health in carrying out the provisions of all health and sanitary laws and regulations of the state and shall complete continuing education in public health as directed by the local board of health. Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the local board of health may fix reasonable fees and charges for services, except for follow-up of communicable diseases and for individuals who receive services under the public health nursing infant home visitation subprogram created by W.S.

35-27-102

. No person shall be denied necessary nursing services within the limits of available personnel because of an inability to pay the cost of such services.

through (v) Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 127, § 2.

All moneys collected hereunder shall be paid directly to the city or county treasurer and placed in the corresponding health department fund.

Prior to the establishment of any fee under this section, the local board of health, the city council or the board of county commissioners, as appropriate, shall hold a public hearing after providing forty-five (45) days written notice of the hearing. No fee shall be imposed by the local board of health under this section without the prior approval of the city council or the board of county commissioners, as appropriate. No fee established under this section shall exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00).

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 133, § 5; 1955, ch. 48, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-31; Laws 1961, ch. 207, § 2; 1989, ch. 199, § 1; 2001, ch. 127, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 108, § 1; 2021 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to supervision of county health officers, see §

35-1-227

.

As to establishment of local health departments, see §

35-1-301

.

For provisions dealing with health department funds, see §

35-1-304

.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (a), added the second and third sentences and made stylistic changes.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 49, § 2, provides: “This act applies to persons appointed as county, municipal or district health officers on and after July 1, 2021.”

§ 35-1-306.
Appointment of health officer and other personnel where departments not established; fees and charges for services; payment.

In counties or municipalities where such departments are not established the boards of county commissioners or municipal governing body shall appoint the county or municipal health officer and other necessary personnel. The governing body of any combination of municipalities, counties, or municipalities and counties where such departments are not established may form a health district and appoint a district health officer thereof. The term of office for the county, municipal or district health officer shall be four (4) years unless sooner removed by the board of county commissioners, municipal or district governing body. The county, municipal or district health officer shall have a degree of doctor of medicine, be an advanced practice registered nurse as defined in W.S. 33-21-120(a)(i) or be a physician assistant as defined in W.S. 33-26-501(a)(iii). The county, municipal or district health officer shall assist the state department of health in carrying out the provisions of all health and sanitary laws and regulations of the state and shall complete continuing education in public health as directed by the local board of county commissioners, health district or municipal governing body.

Each part-time county, municipal, or district health officer shall receive a minimum compensation of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per month and necessary travel expenses incurred while engaged in the duties of his office.

There is hereby authorized to be appointed by the boards of county commissioners, municipal, or district governing bodies so desiring, a deputy health officer, public health nurses, sanitarians, and such other public health personnel as may be deemed necessary to adequately protect the public health to serve under the county, municipal or district health officer. Such deputy health officer shall have the same authority in his area as the health officer and shall be compensated at a maximum rate of two-thirds the salary paid to the health officer of the county, municipality or district.

Each public health nurse, sanitarian, and such other professional public health personnel appointed under the provisions of this act [§§

35-1-301

through

35-1-309

] shall meet the position specifications established by the state merit rule for such positions. Boards of county commissioners, municipal, or district governing bodies are authorized and empowered to make appropriations for the compensation and necessary expenses for such public health personnel from such unencumbered funds as may be available. Said boards shall have the power to set all salaries for all personnel.

Boards of county commissioners, municipal or district governing bodies may fix reasonable fees and charges for services, except for follow-up of communicable diseases and for individuals who receive services under the public health nursing infant home visitation subprogram created by W.S.

35-27-102

. No person shall be denied necessary nursing services within the limits of available personnel because of an inability to pay the cost of such services.

through (v) Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 127, § 2.

Payment, in whole or in part for such services may be accepted from any person. Payment of any charges due may be accepted from a local county, state or federal public assistance agency or any combination thereof; or from any individual, governmental agency, or corporation, public or private, when such services are provided any person, including but not limited to a recipient of any type of social security aids administered by the federal or state governments, or a recipient of direct relief.

All monies collected or appropriated hereunder shall be paid directly to the treasurer of the county, municipality or district, as the case may be, for credit to a county, municipal, or district health fund in the manner provided in W.S.

35-1-304

, for county, municipal, and district health departments. Any monies credited to said fund shall be expended only for the compensation and necessary expenses for such public health personnel and claims or demand against said fund shall be allowed upon certification by the health officer or a designated member of the governing board.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 133, § 6; 1955, ch. 48, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-32; Laws 1963, ch. 132, § 1; 1989, ch. 199, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2001, ch. 127, §§ 1, 2; 2021 ch. 49, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to supervision of county health officers, see §

35-1-227

.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the last sentence of (a), which read, "He shall have a degree of doctor of medicine, and shall assist the state department of health in carrying out the provisions of all health and sanitary laws and regulations of the state."

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 49, § 2, provides: “This act applies to persons appointed as county, municipal or district health officers on and after July 1, 2021.”

§ 35-1-307.
Purpose of health units.

The establishment of full-time local health units is for public health and preventive medical purposes for the people of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 133, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 35-33.

§ 35-1-308.
Dissolution and discontinuance.

Any county and/or city or district health department may be dissolved and discontinued by resolution of the board of county commissioners and/or city governing body of a county and/or city maintaining a county and/or city health department, or by resolutions of the boards of county commissioners and/or city governing board of the counties and/or cities maintaining a district health department; provided, however, that no department shall be dissolved within the two (2) year period following the date of its establishment. Within ninety (90) days after the passage of a resolution or resolutions dissolving a department, the county and/or city or district board of health shall proceed to terminate the affairs of the department. After payment of all obligations, any moneys remaining in a county and/or city health department fund shall be credited to the general fund of the county and/or city, and any moneys remaining in a district health department fund shall be apportioned among the counties comprising the district in the same manner as the cost of maintaining the department was apportioned among the counties, and credited to their respective general funds. All other property of the county and/or city or district health department shall be disposed of as may be agreed upon by the county and/or city or district board of health.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 133, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 35-34.

§ 35-1-309.
Adjacent county without department becoming part of health district by agreement.

Generally. — Any county adjacent to a district maintaining a district health department may become a part of such district by agreement between its board of county commissioners and the boards of county commissioners of the counties comprising the district. Any such county upon being accepted into the district, shall thereupon become subject to all the provisions of this act [§§

35-1-301

through

35-1-309

] as though it were originally a part of the district.

Withdrawing from districts. — Any county in a district may withdraw from the district by resolution of its board of county commissioners; provided, however, that no county may withdraw from a district within the two (2) year period following the establishment of the district or the county’s becoming a part of the district, and then only after ninety (90) days written notice given to the department. In the event of withdrawal of a county from a district, any funds which had been appropriated by the county before withdrawal, to cover its proportionate share of maintaining the district, shall not be returned to the county withdrawing.

History.

Laws 1951, ch. 133, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 35-35.

§ 35-1-310.
Limitation on orders.

No public health order requested or issued by a county, municipal or district health officer under this article shall become effective without notice being provided to the public not less than forty-eight (48) hours before the order is to become effective and an opportunity to provide public comment through written and electronic submissions is provided, except when the delay will result in immediate and life threatening physical harm, exposure or transmission beyond the existing affected area. Any order issued under this chapter by a county, municipal or district health officer that restricts individuals’ movements or their ability to engage in any activity, that applies to individuals not under an isolation or quarantine order and that is designed to prevent or limit the transmission of a contagious or possibly contagious disease shall be effective for a period of not more than ten (10) days. Subsequent orders, including order extensions, for the same or substantially same purpose of any duration shall only be issued as follows:

The board of county commissioners, by a vote of the majority of the board, may issue an order subsequent to an order issued by a county health officer;

The governing body of a municipality, by a vote of the majority of the governing body, may issue an order subsequent to an order issued by a municipal health officer;

The governing body of a political subdivision that is a member of a health district or a district health department, by a majority vote of the governing body, may issue an order subsequent to an order issued by a district health officer to have effect within the governing body’s political subdivision only.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit a parent or guardian’s right to the care, custody and control of a minor child under the care of the parent or guardian.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit a caregiver’s right to the care, custody and control of a vulnerable adult.

As used in this section:

“Caregiver” means a family member responsible, or a person with court ordered responsibility, for the care, custody and control of a vulnerable adult;

“Vulnerable adult” means as defined in W.S. 35-20-102(a)(xviii).

History.

2021 ch. 168, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 168, § 4, provides: "This act shall only apply to orders issued by the state health officer or municipal, county or district health officers on or after the effective date of this act. No order issued before the effective date of this act shall be subject to this act during any period for which the public health order is effective."

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 168, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.